Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1735
Rules and regulations; contracts; operation.

The governing body of any such city of the metropolitan class shall make all necessary rules and regulations governing the use, operation, and control of the facilities authorized by sections 14-1731 to 14-1740. In the exercise of the grant of power set forth in sections 14-1731 to 14-1740, the city of the metropolitan class shall make contracts with others, if such contracts are necessary and needed for the payment of the revenue bonds authorized in sections 14-1731 to 14-1740 and for the successful operation of the parking facilities. If the city is unable to secure a reasonable lease with another party for operation of the facility, the city may operate the facility itself. The governing body may also make any other agreements with the purchasers of the bonds for the security of the issuing city and the purchasers of such bonds not in contravention of the provisions of sections 14-1731 to 14-1740.

Laws 1971, LB 238, § 5;

Laws 1979, LB 181, § 2.